Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 17. General Powers

§ 21-17-1.
General grant of powers.

Every municipality of this state shall be a municipal corporation and shall have power to sue and be sued; to purchase and hold real estate, either within or without the corporate limits, for all proper municipal purposes, including parks, cemeteries, hospitals, schoolhouses, houses of correction, waterworks, electric lights, sewers and other proper municipal purposes; to purchase and hold personal property for all proper municipal purposes; to sell or dispose of personal property or real property owned by it consistent with Section 17-25-25; to acquire equipment and machinery by lease-purchase agreement and to pay interest thereon, if contracted, when needed for proper municipal purposes; and to sell and convey any real property owned by it, and make such order respecting the same as may be deemed conducive to the best interest of the municipality, and exercise jurisdiction over the same.

In case any of the real property belonging to a municipality shall cease to be used for municipal purposes, the governing authority of the municipality may sell, convey or lease the same on such terms as the municipal authority may elect. In case of a sale on a credit, the municipality shall charge appropriate interest as contracted and shall have a lien on the same for the purchase money, as against all persons, until paid and may enforce the lien as in such cases provided by law. The deed of conveyance in such cases shall be executed in the name of the municipality by the governing authority of the municipality pursuant to an order entered on the minutes. In any sale or conveyance of real property, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same. Except as otherwise provided in this section, before any such lease, deed or conveyance is executed, the governing authority of the municipality shall publish at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, in a public newspaper of the municipality in which the real property is located, or if no newspaper be published as such, then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the intention to lease or sell, as the case may be, the municipally owned real property and to accept sealed competitive bids for the leasing or sale. The governing authority of the municipality shall thereafter accept bids for the lease or sale and shall award the lease or sale to the highest bidder in the manner provided by law. However, whenever the governing authority of the municipality shall find and determine, by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon its minutes (i) that any municipally owned real property is no longer needed for municipal or related purposes and is not to be used in the operation of the municipality, (ii) that the sale of such property in the manner otherwise provided by law is not necessary or desirable for the financial welfare of the municipality, and (iii) that the use of such property for the purpose for which it is to be sold, conveyed or leased will promote and foster the development and improvement of the community in which it is located and the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare thereof, the governing authority of the municipality shall be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to sell, convey or lease same for any of the purposes set forth herein without having to advertise for and accept competitive bids.

In any case in which a municipality proposes to sell, convey or lease real property under the provisions of this subsection (2) without advertising for and accepting competitive bids, the governing authority may sell, convey or lease the property as follows:

Consideration for the purchase, conveyance or lease of the property shall be not less than the average of the fair market price for such property as determined by at least two (2) professional property appraisers selected by the municipality and approved by the purchaser or lessee. Appraisal fees shall be shared equally by the municipality and the purchaser or lessee;

The governing authority of a municipality may contract for the professional services of a Mississippi licensed real estate broker to assist the municipality in the marketing and sale or lease of the property, and may provide the broker reasonable compensation for services rendered to be paid from the sale or lease proceeds. The reasonable compensation shall not exceed the usual and customary compensation for similar services within the municipality; or

The governing authority of a municipality may lease property of less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) square feet to any person or legal entity by having two (2) appraisals establish the fair market value of the lease, and on such other terms and conditions as the parties may agree, such lease being lawfully adopted and spread upon its official minutes.

Whenever the governing authority of the municipality shall find and determine by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon the minutes that municipally owned real property is not used for municipal purposes and therefore surplus as set forth in subsection (2) of this section:

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (a), the governing authority may donate such lands to a bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Mississippi and granted tax-exempt status by the Internal Revenue Service and may donate such lands and necessary funds related thereto to the public school district in which the land is situated for the purposes set forth herein. Any deed or conveyance executed pursuant hereto shall contain a clause of reverter providing that the bona fide not-for-profit corporation or public school district may hold title to such lands only so long as they are continued to be used for the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare of the community, and that title shall revert to the municipality in the event of the cessation of such use for a period of two (2) years. In any such deed or conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same;

If the governing authority of a municipality with a total population of greater than forty thousand (40,000) but not more than forty-two thousand five hundred (42,500) according to the 2010 federal decennial census, donates real property to a bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation and such civic or eleemosynary corporation commits Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to renovate or make capital improvements to the property by an agreement between a certain state institution of higher learning and the civic or eleemosynary corporation, then the clause of reverter required by this paragraph shall provide that title of such real property shall revert 1. to the bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation, if a certain state institution of higher learning ceases to use the property for the purposes required by this paragraph (a) for donated lands, or 2. to the municipality, if a certain state institution of higher learning ceases to use the property for the purposes required by this paragraph (a) and the not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation or its successor ceases to exist;

The governing authority may donate such lands to a bona fide not-for-profit corporation (such as Habitat for Humanity) which is primarily engaged in the construction of housing for persons who otherwise can afford to live only in substandard housing. In any such deed or conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same;

In the event the governing authority does not wish to donate title to such lands to the bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation, but wishes to retain title to the lands, the governing authority may lease the lands to a bona fide not-for-profit corporation described in paragraph (a) or this paragraph (b) for less than fair market value;

The governing authority may donate any municipally owned lot measuring twenty-five (25) feet or less along the frontage line as follows: the governing authority may cause the lot to be divided in half along a line running generally perpendicular to the frontage line and may convey each one-half (1/2) of that lot to the owners of the parcels laterally adjoining the municipally owned lot. All costs associated with a conveyance under this paragraph (c) shall be paid by the person or entity to whom the conveyance is made. In any such deed or instrument of conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same;

Nothing contained in this subsection (3) shall be construed to prohibit, restrict or to prescribe conditions with regard to the authority granted under Section 17-25-3.

Every municipality shall also be authorized and empowered to loan to private persons or entities, whether organized for profit or nonprofit, funds received from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) under an urban development action grant or a community development block grant under the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383), as amended, and to charge interest thereon if contracted, provided that no such loan shall include any funds from any revenues other than the funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; to make all contracts and do all other acts in relation to the property and affairs of the municipality necessary to the exercise of its governmental, corporate and administrative powers; and to exercise such other or further powers as are otherwise conferred by law.

The governing authority of any municipality may establish an employer-assisted housing program to provide funds to eligible employees to be used toward the purchase of a home. This assistance may be applied toward the down payment, closing costs or any other fees or costs associated with the purchase of a home. The housing assistance may be in the form of a grant, forgivable loan or repayable loan. The governing authority of a municipality may contract with one or more public or private entities to provide assistance in implementing and administering the program and shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the eligibility of a municipality for the program and for the implementation and administration of the program. However, no general funds of a municipality may be used for a grant or loan under the program.

Participation in the program established under this subsection (5) shall be available to any eligible municipal employee as determined by the governing authority of the municipality. Any person who receives financial assistance under the program must purchase a house and reside within certain geographic boundaries as determined by the governing authority of the municipality.

If the assistance authorized under this subsection (5) is structured as a forgivable loan, the participating employee must remain as an employee of the municipality for an agreed upon period of time, as determined by the rules and regulations adopted by the governing authority of the municipality, in order to have the loan forgiven. The forgiveness structure, amount of assistance and repayment terms shall be determined by the governing authority of the municipality.

The governing authority of any municipality may contract with a private attorney or private collection agent or agency to collect any type of delinquent payment owed to the municipality, including, but not limited to, past-due fees, fines and other assessments, or with the district attorney of the circuit court district in which the municipality is located to collect any delinquent fees, fines and other assessments. Any such contract debt may provide for payment contingent upon successful collection efforts or payment based upon a percentage of the delinquent amount collected; however, the entire amount of all delinquent payments collected shall be remitted to the municipality and shall not be reduced by any collection costs or fees. Any private attorney or private collection agent or agency contracting with the municipality under the provisions of this subsection shall give bond or other surety payable to the municipality in such amount as the governing authority of the municipality deems sufficient. Any private attorney with whom the municipality contracts under the provisions of this subsection must be a member in good standing of The Mississippi Bar. Any private collection agent or agency with whom the municipality contracts under the provisions of this subsection must meet all licensing requirements for doing business in the State of Mississippi. Neither the municipality nor any officer or employee of the municipality shall be liable, civilly or criminally, for any wrongful or unlawful act or omission of any person or business with whom the municipality has contracted under the provisions of this subsection. The Mississippi Department of Audit shall establish rules and regulations for use by municipalities in contracting with persons or businesses under the provisions of this subsection. If a municipality uses its own employees to collect any type of delinquent payment owed to the municipality, then from and after July 1, 2000, the municipality may charge an additional fee for collection of the delinquent payment provided the payment has been delinquent for ninety (90) days. The collection fee may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the delinquent payment if the collection is made within this state and may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the delinquent payment if the collection is made outside this state. In conducting collection of delinquent payments, the municipality may utilize credit cards or electronic fund transfers. The municipality may pay any service fees for the use of such methods of collection from the collection fee, but not from the delinquent payment. There shall be due to the municipality from any person whose delinquent payment is collected under a contract executed as provided in this subsection an amount, in addition to the delinquent payment, of not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the delinquent payment for collections made within this state, and not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the delinquent payment for collections made outside of this state.

In addition to such authority as is otherwise granted under this section, the governing authority of any municipality may expend funds necessary to maintain and repair, and to purchase liability insurance, tags and decals for, any personal property acquired under the Federal Excess Personal Property Program that is used by the local volunteer fire department.

In addition to the authority to expend matching funds under Section 21-19-65, the governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may expend municipal funds to match any state, federal or private funding for any program administered by the State of Mississippi, the United States government or any nonprofit organization that is exempt under 26 USCS Section 501(c)(3) from paying federal income tax.

The governing authority of any municipality that owns and operates a gas distribution system, as defined in Section 21-27-11(b), and the governing authority of any public natural gas district are authorized to contract for the purchase of the supply of natural gas for a term of up to ten (10) years with any public nonprofit corporation which is organized under the laws of this state or any other state.

The governing authority of any municipality may perform and exercise any duty, responsibility or function, may enter into agreements and contracts, may provide and deliver any services or assistance, and may receive, expend and administer any grants, gifts, matching funds, loans or other monies, in accordance with and as may be authorized by any federal law, rule or regulation creating, establishing or providing for any program, activity or service. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as authorizing any municipality or the governing authority of such municipality to perform any function or activity that is specifically prohibited under the laws of this state or as granting any authority in addition to or in conflict with the provisions of any federal law, rule or regulation.

In addition to such authority as is otherwise granted under this section, the governing authority of a municipality, in its discretion, may sell, lease, donate or otherwise convey property to any person or legal entity without public notice, without having to advertise for and accept competitive bids and without appraisal, with or without consideration, and on such terms and conditions as the parties may agree if the governing authority finds and determines, by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon its official minutes:

1. By reason of a tax sale;

2. Because the property was abandoned or blighted; or

3. In a proceeding to satisfy a municipal lien against the property;

The subject property is real property acquired by the municipality:

The subject property is blighted and is located in a blighted area;

The subject property is not needed for governmental or related purposes and is not to be used in the operation of the municipality;

That the sale of the property in the manner otherwise provided by law is not necessary or desirable for the financial welfare of the municipality; and

That the use of the property for the purpose for which it is to be conveyed will promote and foster the development and improvement of the community in which it is located or the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare thereof; the purpose for which the property is conveyed shall be stated.

Any deed or instrument of conveyance executed pursuant to the authority granted under this subsection shall contain a clause of reverter providing that title to the property will revert to the municipality if the person or entity to whom the property is conveyed does not fulfill the purpose for which the property was conveyed and satisfy all conditions imposed on the conveyance within two (2) years of the date of the conveyance.

In any such deed or instrument of conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same.

The governing authority of any municipality may enter into agreements and contracts with any housing authority, as defined in Section 43-33-1, to provide extra police protection in exchange for the payment of compensation or a fee to the municipality.

The governing authority of any municipality may reimburse the cost of an insured’s deductible for an automobile insurance coverage claim if the claim has been paid for damages to the insured’s property arising from the negligence of a duly authorized officer, agent, servant, attorney or employee of the municipality in the performance of his or her official duties, and the officer, agent, servant, attorney or employee owning or operating the motor vehicle is protected by immunity under the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, Section 11-46-1 et seq.

The powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or to prescribe conditions concerning, any practice or practices authorized under any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2923; 1906, § 3314; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5811; 1930, § 2391; 1942, § 3374-112; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 112; Laws, 1957, Ex. ch. 13, § 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 425; Laws, 1966, ch. 592, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 408; Laws, 1981, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 444; Laws, 1992, ch. 335 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 455, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 639, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 515, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 483, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 560, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 517, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 364, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 432, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 21-17-3.
Exercise of powers.

The powers granted to municipalities by law shall be exercised by the governing authorities of such municipalities, in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2924; 1906, § 3315; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5812; 1930, § 2392; 1942, § 3374-113; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 113, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-17-5.
Powers of governing authorities.

The governing authorities of every municipality of this state shall have the care, management and control of the municipal affairs and its property and finances. In addition to those powers granted by specific provisions of general law, the governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to adopt any orders, resolutions or ordinances with respect to such municipal affairs, property and finances which are not inconsistent with the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other statute or law of the State of Mississippi, and shall likewise have the power to alter, modify and repeal such orders, resolutions or ordinances. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the powers granted to governing authorities of municipalities in this section are complete without the existence of or reference to any specific authority granted in any other statute or law of the State of Mississippi. Unless otherwise provided by law, before entering upon the duties of their respective offices, the aldermen or councilmen of every municipality of this state shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to five percent (5%) of the sum of all the municipal taxes shown by the assessment rolls and the levies to have been collectible in the municipality for the year immediately preceding the commencement of the term of office of said alderman or councilman; however, such bond shall not exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). For all municipalities with a population more than two thousand (2,000) according to the latest federal decennial census, the amount of the bond shall not be less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). Any taxpayer of the municipality may sue on such bond for the use of the municipality, and such taxpayer shall be liable for all costs in case his suit shall fail. No member of the city council or board of aldermen shall be surety for any other such member.

Unless such actions are specifically authorized by another statute or law of the State of Mississippi, this section shall not authorize the governing authorities of municipalities to (a) levy taxes of any kind or increase the levy of any authorized tax, (b) issue bonds of any kind, (c) change the requirements, practices or procedures for municipal elections or establish any new elective office, (d) change the procedure for annexation of additional territory into the municipal boundaries, (e) change the structure or form of the municipal government, (f) permit the sale, manufacture, distribution, possession or transportation of alcoholic beverages, (g) grant any donation, or (h) without prior legislative approval, regulate, directly or indirectly, the amount of rent charged for leasing private residential property in which the municipality does not have a property interest.

Nothing in this or any other section shall be construed so as to prevent any municipal governing authority from paying any municipal employee not to exceed double his ordinary rate of pay or awarding any municipal employee not to exceed double his ordinary rate of compensatory time for work performed in his capacity as a municipal employee on legal holidays. The governing authority of any municipality shall enact leave policies to ensure that a public safety employee is paid or granted compensatory time for the same number of holidays for which any other municipal employee is paid.

The governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may expend funds to provide for training and education of newly elected or appointed municipal officials before the beginning of the term of office or employment of such officials. Any expenses incurred for such purposes may be allowed only upon prior approval of the governing authority. Any payments or reimbursements made under the provisions of this subsection may be paid only after presentation to and approval by the governing authority of the municipality.

The governing authority of any municipality may lease the naming rights to municipal property to a private commercial entity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2925; 1906, § 3316; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5813; 1930, § 2393; 1942, § 3374-114; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 114; Laws, 1985, ch. 487; Laws, 1989, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 430 § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 363, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 515, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 546, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 11; Laws, 2016, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 21-17-7.
Appropriation of funds.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to appropriate the funds thereof for the current expenses of the municipality in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2942; 1906, § 333; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5830; 1930, § 2409; 1942, § 3374-125; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 125, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-17-9.
Amendment of municipal charter at behest of governing authority.

When a municipality now existing, which has not adopted the code charter or commission form of government, but is governed by another charter, shall desire to amend its charter, the same may be done in this way: the mayor and board of aldermen, city council, or municipal authority, by whatever name known, may prepare, in writing, the desired amendment or amendments and have the same published for three (3) weeks in a legal newspaper published in the municipality, if there be one, and, if none, then by posting for said time in at least three (3) public places therein, after which the proposed amendment or amendments shall be submitted to the Governor, who shall submit the same to the Attorney General for his opinion. The publication of the amendment or amendments may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. If the Attorney General is of the opinion that the proposed amendment or amendments are consistent with the Constitution and laws of the United States and the Constitution of this state, the Governor shall approve the proposed amendment or amendments. If, after publication is made, one-tenth (1/10) of the qualified electors of the municipality shall protest against the proposed amendments, or any of them, the Governor shall not approve the ones protested against until they shall be submitted to and ratified by a majority of the electors of the municipality voting in a special election. Amendments, when approved by the Governor, shall be recorded, at the expense of the municipality, in the office of the Secretary of State and upon the records of the mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing authorities of the municipality, and when so recorded shall have the force and effect of law. No amendment to the private or special charter of any municipality shall be adopted or approved when such amendment is in conflict with any of the provisions of this title expressly made applicable to municipalities operating under a private or special charter, or is in conflict with the provisions of any other legislation expressly made applicable to any such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3039; 1906, § 3444; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6004; 1930, § 2625; 1942, § 3374-109; Laws, 1948, ch. 383, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 109; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 3, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 21-17-11.
Amendment of municipal charter at behest of electorate.

It shall be lawful for any number, not less than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of any municipality, by petition, to propose an amendment or amendments to the charter of such municipality not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of the United States, or the Constitution of this state. The said amendment or amendments shall be published for three (3) weeks prior to a special election in a newspaper published in the municipality, if there be one, and if not, by posting for said time in at least three (3) public places therein. The publication of the amendment or amendments may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. If such election results in favor of any such amendment or amendments, then the amendment or amendments shall be submitted to the Governor, as is provided in Section 21-17-9, and the procedure therein outlined shall be followed, except that it shall not be necessary to republish such amendment or amendments, or resubmit such amendment or amendments for approval of the qualified electors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-110; Laws, 1948, ch. 383, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 110; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 4, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 21-17-13.
Applicability of particular sections.

The provisions of Sections 21-17-9 and 21-17-11, shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under a code charter, special charter, or the commission form of government, except in cases of conflict between the provisions of such sections and the provisions of the special charter of a municipality, or the law governing the commission form of government, in which cases of conflict the provisions of the special charter or the statutes relative to the commission form of government shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-111; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 111, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-17-15.
Establishment of fiscal or financial department in certain municipalities; authority of director.

Within the discretion of the governing authorities of any municipality having a population of seventy-five thousand (75,000) or more according to the latest federal decennial census, there may be established a fiscal or financial department and the director thereof shall be invested with the full authority to act in all financial matters for and on behalf of such municipality as the city clerk is now authorized to act in such matters.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 400, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1974).

§ 21-17-17.
Authority to set regular meeting dates.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 21-3-19, 21-5-13, 21-7-9 and 21-9-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, the governing authorities of any municipality may by ordinance duly adopted change the day of the week set by the appropriate section hereinabove as their regular monthly or bimonthly meeting date. Before the adoption of any such ordinance, the ordinance shall first be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in or having general circulation within the municipality. Once such regular meeting day has been changed, meetings shall be held as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 21-17-19.
Publication of substance of public measure or amendment; content; full text to be posted.

Whenever a municipality is required by law to publish in a newspaper any public measure or amendment thereto, the substance of the public measure or amendment thereto may be printed in lieu of the full text of the public measure or amendment thereto, as provided in this Section. Such a public measure shall include, but shall not be limited to, an ordinance, resolution, amendment to a municipal charter or annual audit. The provisions of this section shall not apply to publication of the annual budget or amendments thereto; such publication shall be made as provided in Chapter 35, Title 21, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The substance of the public measure or amendment thereto shall be an explanatory statement summarizing the full text of the public measure or amendment thereto, in which the chief purpose of the measure is explained in clear and unambiguous language. Such statement shall be prepared by the governing authorities of the municipality, and shall not exceed three hundred (300) words in length to the extent practicable.

During the entire time of the publication of the explanatory statement in a newspaper, a copy of the full text of the public measure or amendment thereto shall be posted by the clerk of the municipality (a) at the city hall, (b) at the main public library in the municipality, or at the courthouse in the judicial district or county in which the municipality is located; and in addition, the clerk shall post such copy at least at one (1) other public place in the municipality. The clerk shall furnish any resident of the municipality a copy of the full text of the public measure or amendment thereto upon request, and this shall be stated in the publication of the explanatory statement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 1, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the addition of this section).